Vermont, session 2025-2026, S77.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. APPROPRIATIONS; OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
(a) In fiscal year 2026, the following sums shall be appropriated from the
Opioid Abatement Special Fund established in 18 V.S.A. § 4774:
(1)(A) $1,976,000.00 to the Department of Health to fund 26 outreach
or case management staff positions within the preferred provider network for
the provision of services that increase motivation of and engagement with
individuals with substance use disorder in settings such as police barracks,
shelters, social service organizations, and elsewhere in the community.
VT LEG #380743 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.77
2025 Page 2 of 6
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that these positions shall
be funded annually by the Opioid Abatement Special Fund unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(2)(A) $1,100,000.00 to the Department of Health for the purpose of
awarding grants to the City of Burlington for establishing an overdose
prevention center upon submission of a grant proposal that has been approved
by the Burlington City Council and meets the requirements of 18 V.S.A.
§ 4256, including the guidelines developed by the Department of Health.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly to continue to appropriate
funds from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund through fiscal year 2028 for
the purpose of awarding grants to the City of Burlington for the operation of
the overdose prevention center, unless and until the Special Fund does not have
sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(3)(A) $1,200,000.00 to the Department of Health for recovery
residences certified by the Vermont Alliance for Recovery Residences,
including at least two new recovery residences certified by the Vermont
Alliance for Recovery Residences.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that recovery residences
be funded annually at not less than fiscal year 2025 levels, unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(4)(A) $1,050,000.00 to the Department of Health for syringe services.
VT LEG #380743 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.77
2025 Page 3 of 6
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that syringe services be
funded annually at not less than fiscal year 2025 levels, unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(5) $800,000.00 to the Department of Health for grants to providers for
ongoing support for contingency management.
(6) $32,157.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to the
Brattleboro Fire Department to establish community training programs on the
administration of opioid antagonists, CPR, first aid, and Stop the Bleed
protocols.
(7) $44,229.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to the
Champlain Housing Trust to continue a pilot program providing access to
wound care and preventative health care in three low-barrier shelters within
Chittenden County.
(8) $800,000.00 to the Department for Children and Families’ Office of
Economic Opportunity to support long-term programs at shelters for
individuals experiencing homelessness, including harm-reduction supports and
clinical nursing programs.
(9) $309,000.00 to the Department of Health for HCRS’ Project
Connectionworks to reduce opioid use disorder morbidity and mortality in
Windham County through prevention, treatment, and recovery services.
VT LEG #380743 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.77
2025 Page 4 of 6
(10) $35,000.00 to the Department of Corrections for distribution to
Pathways Vermont to implement a contingency management pilot program in
Chittenden County for individuals under the supervision of the Department of
Corrections.
(11) $50,0000.00 to the Judicial Branch to train Vermont’s judges on
issues related to opioid use disorder and strategies for use in dockets statewide.
(12) $76,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Vermonters for Criminal Justice Reform to fund an outreach worker position.
(13) $200,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Elevate
Youth Services to establish Healthy Youth Program counselors at the
Basement Teen Center at Kellogg-Hubbard Library in Washington County.
(14) $100,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Friends
for Change’s Youth Center for the purpose of delivering intervention strategies
and harm reduction supports to youth and young adults.
(15) $170,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Spectrum Youth and Family Services for two new positions to expand opioid
use disorder screening, treatment, and case management services to youth in
Chittenden and Franklin Counties.
(16) $80,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Prevent
Child Abuse Vermont for the purpose of teaching parenting skills and
VT LEG #380743 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.77
2025 Page 5 of 6
providing social and emotional parenting supports for individuals with opioid
use disorder.
(17) $850,000.00 to the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living for distribution to HireAbility Vermont to provide
specialized employment services for individuals with opioid use disorder in
Burlington, Newport, Rutland, and Bennington.
(18) $550,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Northeast Kingdom Community Action to hire four peer support specialists to
assist individuals with opioid use disorder who are transitioning out of
homelessness into safe, permanent housing.
(19) $150,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Connecticut Valley Addiction Services, Inc. to expand opioid use treatment in
rural Windsor County.
(20) $300,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Vermonters for Criminal Justice Reform and the Johnson Health Center to
continue and improve the Managed Medical Response Partnership.
(21) $30,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Treatment Associates of Washington County Mental Health to hire an
embedded recovery coach.
VT LEG #380743 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.77
2025 Page 6 of 6
(22) $20,824.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Umbrella to provide integrated services between domestic and sexual violence
providers and partners in recovery in northeastern Vermont.
(b) All grant agreements associated with funds appropriated pursuant to
this section shall require outcome and measurements data to be collected and
reported to the department issuing the grant.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380743 v.1